Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,231
Civil action; jurisdiction.

(1) Any action under section 81-15,230, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, against an owner or operator of a facility shall be brought in the district court for the district in which the alleged violation occurred.

(2) Any action under subsection (3) of section 81-15,230 against the administrator may be brought in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the district court shall have jurisdiction in actions brought under section 81-15,230 against an owner or operator of a facility to enforce the requirement concerned and to impose any civil penalty provided for violation of that requirement. The district court shall have jurisdiction in actions brought under section 81-15,230 against the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency and the director to order the agency and the director to perform the act or duty concerned.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 41;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 56.
July 1, 2026